Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 6. Underground Storage Tank Systems.

Cross references. —

For continuation of contracts, rights, liabilities, and obligations created by or under a law amended or repealed by ch. 102, SLA 2006, see § 4(b), ch. 102, SLA 2006 in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78.

Secs. 46.03.360, 46.03.363
Board of storage tank assistance; Reports. [Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 46.03.365.
Regulation of underground petroleum storage tank systems.

The department shall develop a program to abate and prevent pollution from underground petroleum storage tank systems through the adoption of regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Consistent with other provisions in AS

46.03.365

—

46.03.450

, the regulations may govern

notification and registration;

inspection and record keeping;

construction, installation, and performance;

maintenance, operation, and repair;

technical standards, including standards for spill and overfill control, corrosion prevention, and release detection and reporting;

financial responsibility;

certification of underground petroleum storage tank system workers;

corrective action and cost recovery;

closure and abandonment;

enforcement of regulations; and

prevention of releases to protect the public health and environment.

In the regulations adopted under (a) of this section, the department may

distinguish among the sizes, types, classes, locations, and ages of underground petroleum storage tank systems;

provide for exemptions and deferrals determined to be necessary by the department; exemptions and deferrals under this paragraph must be consistent with those granted under federal laws and regulations.

When the regulations adopted under this section address areas governed by federal laws or regulations, the state regulations must be consistent with federal laws and regulations and may not be more stringent than the federal laws and regulations.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 41 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision applicable to regulations adopted before August 5, 2006, see § 4(a), ch. 102, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For certification of underground storage tank workers, see 18 AAC 78, art. 4.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

For underground storage tank laboratory approval, see 18 AAC 78, art. 8.

Sec. 46.03.370.
Educational assistance.

The department shall provide

educational assistance to owners and operators of underground petroleum storage tank systems to help them comply with federal and state laws and regulations applicable to the tank systems, including the registration and notification requirements under AS

46.03.380

—

46.03.400

;

the public with information to help the public understand the effects associated with the release of petroleum and chemical products into the environment, including releases from petroleum and chemical storage tank systems.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990)

Sec. 46.03.375.
Certification of storage tank workers.

The department shall adopt regulations governing the certification of persons who install, test, close, repair, or significantly change the configuration of underground petroleum storage tanks and tank systems. The certification program shall be administered by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development. In consultation with the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall make every reasonable attempt to ensure that opportunities for obtaining certification under this section are available throughout the state. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall organize presentation of national training courses that are available in the state and assist residents of isolated communities who request assistance in becoming certified. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may contract with the University of Alaska, a vocational technical school, or a regional nonprofit organization to provide the education and testing necessary for certification.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall establish fees applicable to certification under this section in an amount necessary to cover the costs of the certification program. The fees shall be collected by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a person may not install, test, close, repair, or significantly change the configuration of an underground petroleum storage tank or tank system unless that person is certified for the appropriate activity under (a) of this section. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person may install, test, close, repair, or significantly change the configuration of an underground petroleum storage tank or tank system without being certified under this section if

the person performs the work under the direct supervision of another who is certified for that work under this section;

the supervisor inspects the work performed; and

after inspection, the supervisor approves the work in writing.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and certifications under this section.

The department shall develop and maintain lists of persons certified under this section to perform the various activities related to underground petroleum storage tanks and tank systems. The department shall provide the lists on request to interested persons.

In this section, “close” means to remove petroleum and sludges from the tanks in the tank system and either fill the tanks with inert solid material or remove, dismantle, and dispose of the tanks.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 24 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 23 — 25 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For certification of underground storage tank workers, see 18 AAC 78, art. 4.

Sec. 46.03.380.
Registration of tanks and tank systems.

A person, including a governmental entity or institution, or a public corporation, who intends to install, have installed, return to operation, or acquire ownership of an underground petroleum storage tank or tank system shall, before the installation or return to operation, or 30 days after acquisition, register the tank or tank system with the department on a form provided by the department and pay the tank registration fee required under AS

46.03.385

.

The owner or operator of an underground petroleum storage tank or tank system that was installed before and is still in use on September 5, 1990 shall register the tank or tank system with the department on a form provided by the department and pay the tank registration fee required under AS

46.03.385

. For each tank or tank system registered under this subsection that was installed before December 22, 1988, the owner or operator shall provide to the department at the time of registration

proof of plans for prompt site assessment or testing for tank tightness;

proof of tank tightness testing or site assessment that occurred within the previous 12 months and

satisfactory performance of the tank or tank system during the test, proof of noncontamination if a site assessment was performed, and proof of compliance with applicable state financial responsibility requirements; or

if the tank or tank system did not perform satisfactorily during the test, or the site assessment showed evidence of contamination, a summary of the upgrading, repair, containment, or cleanup efforts that have been or will be used for the tank, tank system, or site.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 70 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (b)(2) was enacted as (b)(3), and (b)(2)(B) was enacted as (b)(3)(B)(i).
Renumbered in 1999 to reflect the 1999 repeal of former (b)(2) and former (b)(3)(B)(ii).

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.385.
Registration fee.

At the time of registration under AS

46.03.380

, and annually thereafter, the owner or operator shall pay to the department a registration fee for each tank registered unless the owner or operator has notified the department under AS

46.03.395

that the tank has been taken out of service. An underground storage tank that has leak detection, spill and overflow protection, and corrosion protection that meet requirements of the department is subject to a $50 annual registration fee, regardless of tank capacity. An underground storage tank system that lacks any or all of these features is subject to an annual registration fee of

$150 if the underground storage tank capacity is less than 1,000 gallons;

$300 if the underground storage tank capacity is 1,000 — 5,000 gallons;

$500 if the underground storage tank capacity is over 5,000 gallons.

An underground petroleum storage tank or tank system owned or operated by the federal or state government is exempt from the registration fee in (a) of this section.

A registration fee that is not paid within 30 days of when it is due shall be increased by a late payment fee equal to $10 per day until the day of payment.

The first annual fee under this section must be accompanied by the information required under AS

46.03.400

. Subsequent annual fees must be accompanied by the names and addresses of the owner and operator of the tank system, and the location and capacity of, and substance being stored in, the tanks for which the fee is being submitted.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 25 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 41 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.390.
Notification of changes in tank systems.

An owner or operator who intends to significantly change the configuration of an underground petroleum storage tank system shall notify the department before beginning work on the change by completing and returning to the department a notification form obtained from the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.395.
Notification of tank system closure.

If an underground petroleum tank or storage tank system is taken out of operation, the owner or operator of the tank or tank system, or an agent on the owner’s or operator’s behalf, shall provide on forms obtained from the department

notification of that fact to the department at least 15 days, but not more than 60 days, before the date the tank or tank system will be taken out of operation unless the tank or tank system is taken out of operation because of an emergency; in emergency situations, the owner or operator shall provide notification as promptly as possible under the circumstances; and

evidence satisfactory to the department within 30 days after the tank or tank system is taken out of operation that the owner or operator has complied with applicable state and federal laws and regulations governing temporary or permanent tank closure.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

For certification of underground storage tank workers, see 18 AAC 78, art. 4.

Sec. 46.03.400.
Registration forms.

The registration forms required under AS

46.03.380

—

46.03.395

must require information about the geographical location of a tank or tank system, the estimated age of the tanks and tank system, the total capacity, type of construction, internal and external protection, and piping of the tanks and tank system, and the substance currently or proposed to be stored in the tank system. If the tank or tank system is newly installed, the owner or operator shall certify that the owner or operator has complied with installation, release detection, corrosion protection, and financial responsibility requirements of state and federal law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.405.
Prohibitions.

A person, including a governmental entity or institution or a public corporation, may not operate an underground petroleum storage tank or tank system unless

the tank and tank system are registered with the department as provided in AS

46.03.365

—

46.03.450

or other law; and

the person has provided to the department proof of financial responsibility to the extent required under regulations adopted under AS

46.03.365

or proof of application for arrangements that would satisfy state financial responsibility requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 41 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.410.
Underground storage tank revolving loan fund. [Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 46.03.415.
Tank tightness and site assessment incentive program. [Repealed, § 14 ch 70 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 46.03.420.
Tank cleanup program. [Repealed, § 21 ch 41 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 46.03.422.
Tank cleanup loan program. [Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 46.03.430.
Tank upgrading and closure program. [Repealed, § 20 ch 41 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 46.03.440.
Confidentiality of financial records.

Financial records submitted to the department or to the former Board of Storage Tank Assistance by the owner or operator of an underground petroleum storage tank system are confidential and not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

. The department, in consultation with the affected owner or operator, shall determine which information is confidential under this subsection.

The confidentiality conferred by (a) of this section does not apply to statistical information compiled by the department about the number, capacity, and location of underground petroleum storage tank systems in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Administrative Code. —

For storage tank assistance fund, see 18 AAC 78, art. 5.

Sec. 46.03.450.
Definitions.

In AS

46.03.365

—

46.03.450

,

“chemical” means any substance defined in 42 U.S.C. 9601(14) (sec. 101(14) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980), as amended, and any substance having the characteristics identified or listed under 42 U.S.C. 6921 (sec. 3001 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act), regardless of whether the substance is a solid waste;

“corrective action” means action necessary to stop the migration, determine the extent, and undertake recovery of petroleum after its unpermitted release; clean up affected soil and groundwater; and stabilize the site of the release to prevent or remove hazards to public health or the environment;

“farm” means a tract of land devoted to the production of crops or raising animals, including fish, and associated residences and improvements; “farm” includes fish hatcheries, rangelands, and nurseries with growing operations;

“petroleum” means crude oil or any fraction of crude oil that is liquid at 60 degrees Fahrenheit and pressure of 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute; “petroleum” includes petroleum-based substances comprised of a complex blend of hydrocarbons derived from crude oil through processes of separation, conversion, upgrading, and finishing, such as motor fuels, jet fuels, distillate fuel oils, residual fuel oils, lubricants, petroleum solvents, and used oils;

“release” has the meaning given in AS

46.08.900

;

“site assessment” means investigation of suspected underground petroleum storage tank system leaks and source identification;

“tank system” means an underground petroleum storage tank system;

“underground storage tank” means one or a combination of stationary devices, including underground pipes connected to the devices, that is designed to contain an accumulation of petroleum, the volume of which, including the volume of underground pipes, is 10 percent or more beneath the surface of the ground, except that the term does not include a

farm or residential tank of 1,100 gallons or less capacity used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

tank used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored;

septic tank;

pipeline facility, including gathering lines, regulated under 49 U.S.C. 60101 et seq. or that is an intrastate pipeline facility regulated under state laws comparable to the provisions of 49 U.S.C. 60101 et seq.;

surface impoundment, pit, pond, or lagoon;

storm water or waste water collection system;

flow-through process tank;

liquid trap or associated gathering lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operations;

storage tank situated in an underground area such as a basement, cellar, mineworking, drift, shaft, or tunnel, if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor;

tank with a capacity of 110 gallons or less;

tank containing hazardous wastes regulated under 42 U.S.C. 6921 — 6939b; or

tank system that the department has exempted by regulations adopted under AS

46.03.365

;

“underground petroleum storage tank system” means an underground storage tank containing petroleum together with its underground ancillary equipment and related containment system, if any; in this paragraph, “ancillary equipment” means devices used to distribute, meter, or control the flow of petroleum to and from the system, including piping, fittings, flanges, valves, and pumps.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 70 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006; am § 62 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1999 and 2006 to retain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, rewrote (8)(D), removed the (i) through (iii) designations, substituted “49 U.S.C. 60101” for “49 U.S.C. 1671”, added a reference to “49 U.S.C. 60101 et seq.”, and deleted references to the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C. 2001, and the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979.